District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.11

Abolishment of existing government and transfer of functions.

The District of Columbia Council, the Offices of Chairman of the District of Columbia Council, Vice Chairman of the District of Columbia Council, and the 7 other members of the District of Columbia Council, and the Offices of the Commissioner of the District of Columbia and Assistant to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia, as established by Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967, are abolished as of noon January 2, 1975. This section shall not be construed to reinstate any governmental body or office in the District abolished in said plan or otherwise heretofore.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 818, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 711
This section is referenced in § 1-207.16 and § 1-207.71.
1981 Ed., § 1-211.
1973 Ed., § 1-131.